Maryland, session 2026, HB1479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–413.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX” MEANS THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX
FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS FOR THE WASHINGTON–ARLINGTON–ALEXANDRIA,
DC–VA–MD–WV METROPOLITAN AREA OR A SUCCESSOR METROPOLITAN AREA
INDEX PUBLISHED BY THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1479*

HOUSE BILL 1479
(3) “Employer” includes a governmental unit.
[(3)] (4) “Small employer” means an employer that employs [14] 49 or
fewer employees.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section and § 3–414 of this subtitle,
each employer shall pay:
(1) to each employee who is subject to both the federal Act and this subtitle,
at least the greater of:
(i) the minimum wage for that employee under the federal Act; or
(ii) the State minimum wage set under subsection (c) of this section;
and
(2) to each other employee who is subject to this subtitle, at least the
greater of:
(i) the highest minimum wage under the federal Act; or
(ii) the State minimum wage set under subsection (c) of this section.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the State
minimum wage rate is:
(i) [for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2023, $13.25 per
hour; and
(ii)] FOR THE 48–MONTH PERIOD beginning January 1, 2024,
$15.00 per hour;
(II) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028,
$18.00 PER HOUR; AND
(III) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING
JANUARY 1, 2029, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, THE RATE DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSIONER UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) The State minimum wage rate for a small employer is:
(i) [for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2023, $12.80 per
hour; and

HOUSE BILL 1479 3
(ii) beginning] FOR THE 60–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING January
1, 2024, $15.00 per hour;
(II) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029,
$18.00 PER HOUR; AND
(III) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING
JANUARY 1, 2030, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, THE RATE DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSIONER UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH AND SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE SHALL BE INCREASED BY THE AMOUNT, ROUNDED TO
THE NEAREST 5 CENTS, THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF:
1. A. FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THE WAGE
RATE IN EFFECT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE
MINIMUM WAGE RATE IN EFFECT FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH
PERIOD UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
B. FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THE WAGE RATE
IN EFFECT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE MINIMUM
WAGE RATE IN EFFECT FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
2. THE AVERAGE PERCENT GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD, AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II)1 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(II) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, EACH SEPTEMBER 1, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DETERMINE AND
ANNOUNCE:
A. THE AVERAGE PERCENT GROWTH, IF ANY, IN THE
CONSUMER PRICE INDEX BASED ON THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH
PERIOD FOR WHICH DATA ARE AVAILABLE ON MAY 1; AND
B. THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE THAT WILL BE
EFFECTIVE FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING THE FOLLOWING JANUARY 1.

HOUSE BILL 1479
2. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL MAKE THE
ANNOUNCEMENT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH:
A. FOR THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE THAT WILL BE
IN EFFECT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BEGINNING
SEPTEMBER 1, 2028; AND
B. FOR THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE THAT WILL BE
IN EFFECT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BEGINNING
SEPTEMBER 1, 2029.
(III) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT THERE IS A
DECLINE OR NO GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX, THE STATE MINIMUM
WAGE RATE SHALL REMAIN THE SAME AS THE RATE THAT WAS IN EFFECT FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD.
(IV) 1. AN INCREASE IN THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED
5% OF THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE IN EFFECT FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
12–MONTH PERIOD.
2. THE COMMISSIONER MAY NOT TEMPORARILY
SUSPEND AN INCREASE TO THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR ANY REASON.
(d) An employer may pay an employee a wage that equals a rate of 85% of the
State minimum wage established under this section if the employee is under the age of 18
years.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.